Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1606
Semiannual statement; contents.

Such statements shall show (1) the amount of money received and for what fund; (2) the amount of warrants or orders presented and registered, and upon what fund; (3) the amount of warrants or orders paid and from what fund; (4) the amount of money on hand in each fund; (5) the amount of outstanding warrants or orders registered and unpaid; (6) the total amount of money on hand; and (7) the total amount of unpaid claims of the county as of June 15 and December 15 of each year, as certified to the county treasurer by the county clerk.

Laws 1883, c. 21, § 2, p. 182;

R.S.1913, § 5643;

C.S.1922, § 4970;

C.S.1929, § 26-1307;

Laws 1935, c. 53, § 2, p. 183;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-1307;

R.S.1943, § 23-1606.